Wisconsin, session 2025, AB760.
do enact as follows:AB760,14Section 1. 799.01 (1) (cr) of the statutes is amended to read:AB760,2,31799.01 (1) (cr) Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and tort 2claims. Third-party complaints, personal injury claims, and actions based in tort, 3where the amount claimed is $5,000 $10,000 or less.AB760,24Section 2. Initial applicability.AB760,2,65(1) This act first applies to actions commenced on the effective date of this 6subsection.AB760,2,77